Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Chapter 58 Comprehensive Growth Plan
6-58-109. Increased allocation of certain funds for counties and municipalities with approved growth plans.

Upon approval of the growth plan by the local government planning advisory committee but beginning no earlier than July 1, 2000, each municipality within the county and the county shall receive an additional five (5) points on a scale of one hundred (100) points or a comparable percentage increase as determined by the commissioner of economic and community development in any evaluation formula for the allocation of private activity bond authority and for the distribution of grants from the department of economic and community development for the:

Tennessee industrial infrastructure program;

Industrial training service program; and

Community development block grants.

Upon approval of the growth plan by the local government planning advisory committee but beginning no earlier than July 1, 2000, each municipality within the county and the county shall receive an additional five (5) points on a scale of one hundred (100) points or a comparable percentage increase as determined by the commissioner if permissible under federal requirements in any evaluation formula for the distribution of grants from the department of environment and conservation for state revolving fund loans for water and sewer systems; provided, that no such preferences shall be granted if prohibited by federal law or regulation.

Upon approval of the growth plan by the local government planning advisory committee but beginning no earlier than July 1, 2000, each municipality within the county and the county shall receive an additional five (5) points on a scale of one hundred (100) points or a comparable percentage increase as determined by the executive director in any evaluation formula for the distribution of HOUSE or HOME grants from the Tennessee housing development authority or low income tax credits or private activity bond authority; provided, that no such preferences shall be granted if prohibited by federal law or regulation.

Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 10.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of annexation priorities, OAG 98-0148, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 148 (8/12/98).

6-58-110. Certain grants unavailable to counties and municipalities without approved growth plan as of July 1, 2001.

Effective July 1, 2001, the following loan and grant programs shall be unavailable in those counties and municipalities that do not have growth plans approved by the local government planning advisory committee, and shall remain unavailable until growth plans have been approved:

Tennessee housing development agency grant programs;

Community development block grants;

Tennessee industrial infrastructure program grants;

Industrial training service grants;

Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act funds or any subsequent federal authorization for transportation funds; and

Tourism development grants.

Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. The Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act, referred to in this section, is compiled primarily in U.S.C., title 49.

6-58-111. Annexation procedure — Quo warranto action to challenge annexation.

A municipality possesses exclusive authority to annex territory located within its approved urban growth boundaries; therefore, no municipality may annex by ordinance or by referendum any territory located within another municipality's approved urban growth boundaries. Within a municipality's approved urban growth boundaries, a municipality may use any of the methods in chapter 51 of this title to annex territory; provided, that if a quo warranto action is filed to challenge the annexation, the party filing the action has the burden of proving that:

An annexation ordinance is unreasonable for the overall well-being of the communities involved; or

The health, safety, and welfare of the citizens and property owners of the municipality and territory will not be materially retarded in the absence of such annexation.

In any such action, the action shall be tried by the circuit court judge or chancellor without a jury.

Prior to a municipality annexing by ordinance territory outside its existing urban growth boundary whether the territory desired for annexation is within another municipality's urban growth boundary or a county's planned growth area or rural area, it must first amend the growth plan by having its desired change to the urban growth boundary submitted to the coordinating committee and then receive a recommendation for or against the amendment from the coordinating committee, the coordinating committee then must submit the proposed amendment with its recommendation to all the legislative bodies for approval. If the amendment to the growth plan is approved by the legislative bodies or by the dispute resolution panel, it is then submitted to the local government planning advisory committee for its approval. This amendment process must follow the procedure as outlined in § 6-58-104 and the criteria for establishing an urban growth boundary as delineated in § 6-58-106.

As an alternative to a municipality annexing in a county's planned growth area or rural area by first amending the growth plan as described in subdivision (c)(1), a municipality may annex within a county's planned growth area or rural area, but the annexation must be by referendum only and not by ordinance. The municipality must follow the referendum process as provided for in §§ 6-51-104 and 6-51-105.

Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 12; 2005, ch. 246, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 917, §§ 1-3.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of annexation priorities, OAG 98-0148, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 148 (8/12/98).

Annexation after growth plan adopted, OAG 00-036, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 36 (3/6/00).

The General Assembly’s amendments to Chapter 51, as well as its deletion of T.C.A. § 6-58-108, evidence an unequivocal intent to prohibit all annexations by ordinance that are not operative and effective prior to May 16, 2015. Therefore, a municipality may no longer annex territory outside its urban growth boundary, and T.C.A. § 6-58-111(c)(1) has been impliedly repealed. Accordingly, referendum is now the only method that a municipality may use to annex territory outside its urban growth boundary. OAG 17-37, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (8/31/2017).

6-58-112. New municipalities — Property tax — Incorporation election.

After January 1, 1999, a new municipality may only be created in territory approved as a planned growth area in conformity with § 6-58-104;

A county may provide or contract for the provision of services within a planned growth area and set a separate tax rate specifically for the services provided within a planned growth area; and

A county may establish separate zoning regulations within a planned growth area, for territory within an urban growth boundary or within a rural area.

A municipality, incorporated after May 19, 1998, shall impose a property tax that raises an amount of revenue not less than the amount of the annual revenues derived by the municipality from state-shared taxes as estimated by the department of revenue on or before July 1. The municipality shall levy and provide for the administration and collection of a property tax in the required amount before the municipality may receive state-shared taxes. Furthermore, § 6-51-115(b) shall apply within the territory of such newly incorporated municipality as if such territory had been annexed rather than incorporated. For purposes of levying a property tax, the incorporation of a municipality shall be effective on January 1 following the election at which the incorporation is approved.

If the residents of a planned growth area petition to have an election of incorporation, the county legislative body shall approve the corporate limits and the urban growth boundary of the proposed municipality before the election to incorporate may be held.

Within six (6) months of the incorporation election, the municipality shall adopt by ordinance a plan of services for the services the municipality proposes to deliver. The municipality shall prepare and publish its plan of services in a newspaper of general circulation distributed in the municipality. The rights and remedies of § 6-51-108 apply to the plan of services adopted by the municipality.

Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 13; 1999, ch. 169, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 970, § 1; 2013, ch. 256, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning abolishing the prohibition against the establishment of new municipal school systems, please refer to Acts 2013, ch. 256.

Attorney General Opinions. Establishment of new school districts by municipalities in Shelby County. OAG 12-39, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (3/20/12).

6-58-113. Monitoring and reporting by advisory commission on intergovernmental relations.

The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR) shall monitor implementation of this chapter and shall periodically report its findings and recommendations to the general assembly. Each agency of the executive branch, each municipal and county official, each local government organization, including any planning commission and development district, shall cooperate with the commission and provide necessary information and assistance for the commission's reports. TACIR reserve funds may be expended for the purpose of performing duties assigned by this section.

Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 14; 2002, ch. 594, § 1.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

6-58-114. Joint economic and community development board.

It is the intent of the general assembly that local governments engage in long-term planning, and that such planning be accomplished through regular communication and cooperation among local governments, the agencies attached to them, and the agencies that serve them. It is also the intent of the general assembly that the growth plans required result from communication and cooperation among local governments.

There shall be established in each county a joint economic and community development board, which shall be established by interlocal agreement pursuant to § 5-1-113. The purpose of the board is to foster communication relative to economic and community development between and among governmental entities, industry, and private citizens.

Each joint economic and community development board shall be composed of representatives of county and city governments, private citizens, and present industries and businesses. The final makeup of the board shall be determined by interlocal agreement but shall, at a minimum, include the county mayor and the city mayor or city manager, if appropriate, of each city lying within the county and one (1) person who owns land qualifying for classification and valuation under title 67, chapter 5, part 10; provided, that in cases where there are multiple cities, smaller cities may have representation on a rotating basis as determined by the interlocal agreement.

There shall be an executive committee of the board, which shall be composed of members of the joint economic and community development board selected by the entire board. The makeup of the executive committee shall be determined by the entire joint economic and community development board but shall, at a minimum, include the county mayor and the city mayors or city managers of the larger municipalities in the county.

The terms of office shall be determined by the interlocal agreement, but shall be staggered, except for those positions held by elected officials whose terms shall coincide with the terms of office for their elected positions. All terms of office shall be for a maximum of four (4) years.

The board shall meet, at a minimum, four (4) times annually, and the executive committee of the board shall meet at least four (4) times annually. An executive committee meeting shall be held once each calendar quarter. Minutes of all meetings of the board and the executive committee shall be documented by minutes kept and by certification of attendance. Meetings of the joint economic and community development board and its executive committee are subject to the open meetings law.

The activities of the board shall be jointly funded by the participating governments. The formula for determining the amount of funds due from each participating government shall be determined by adding the population of the entire county as established by the last federal decennial census to the populations of each city as determined by the last federal decennial census, or special census as provided for in § 6-51-114, and then determining the percentage that the population of each governmental entity bears to the total amount.

If a special census has been certified pursuant to § 6-51-114, during the five-year period after certification of the last federal decennial census, the formula shall be adjusted by the board to reflect the result of the special census; provided, that the board shall only make such an adjustment during the fifth year following the certification of a federal decennial census.

The board may accept and expend donations, grants and payments from persons and entities other than the participating governments. The board is authorized to transfer or to donate funds from participating governments or outside sources to other public or nonprofit entities within the county to be used for economic or industrial development purposes.

If, on May 19, 1998, a county and city government have a joint economic and community development council that has an established funding mechanism to carry out a unified economic and community development program for the entire county, such funding mechanism shall be utilized in lieu of the formula established in this subsection (g).

An annual budget to fund the activities of the board shall be recommended by the executive committee to the board, which shall adopt a budget before April 1 of each year. The funding formula established by this act shall then be applied to the total amount budgeted by the board as the participating governments' contributions for the ensuing fiscal year. The budget and a statement of the amount due from each participating government shall be immediately filed with the appropriate officer of each participating government. In the event a participating government does not fully fund its contribution, the board may establish and impose such sanctions or conditions as it deems proper.

When applying for any state grant a city or a county shall certify its compliance with the requirements of this section.

If there exists within a county a similar organization on May 19, 1998, that organization may satisfy the requirements of this section. The county mayor shall file a petition with the committee, which shall make a determination whether the existing organization is sufficiently similar to the requirements of this section. When the committee has made its determination, an affected municipality or county may rely upon that status of the existing organization to satisfy the certification requirements of subsection (i).

The county mayor and the mayor, or city manager, if appropriate, of each city lying within the county are authorized to designate an alternate representative, who shall have full authority to vote and participate in all activities of the joint economic and community development board and its executive committee. An alternate appointed to serve on the joint economic and community development board or its executive committee shall have experience or education in the fields of public administration, economic and community development or planning, and be able to speak for the entity represented.

Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 15; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2005, ch. 245, §§ 2, 3; 2006, ch. 608, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Open meetings law, title 8, ch. 44.

Attorney General Opinions. Meetings of county economic development board during which it carries out its function as a joint economic and community development board under T.C.A. § 6-58-114 are subject to the Open Meetings Act, OAG 03-091, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (7/24/03).

Municipality that is not participating in or helping fund local joint economic and community development board would not be eligible for a grant, OAG 05-109, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (7/11/05).

Authority of a joint economic development board the board to acquire an industrial building and lease it to a private business on behalf of all of its constituent members, OAG 05-176 (12/13/05).

Compliance with T.C.A. § 6-58-114, OAG 06-151 (10/2/06).

Applicability of the Public Records Act to records of a county economic development agency, OAG 07-170, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 170 (12/21/07).

Conflicts of interest: joint economic and community development boards. OAG 12-09, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/20/12).

6-58-115. Applicability to pending annexation ordinances.

This chapter shall not apply to any annexation ordinance that was pending, but not yet effective, on November 25, 1997.

Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 16.

6-58-116. Airport — Annexation-free zone.

Notwithstanding §§ 6-58-106, former 6-58-108 [repealed] and 6-58-111, the property of an airport with regularly scheduled commercial passenger service that is located in a county other than the county where the creating municipality is located, except upon approval by resolution of the legislative body of the creating municipality, shall be and remain in an annexation-free zone.

Acts 2002, ch. 572, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 6-58-108 referred to in this section was repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 10, effective June 29, 2015.

6-58-117. Flood insurance rate map or flood hazard boundary map — Requirements for participation in the national flood insurance program.

In cooperation with the department of economic and community development, all counties and municipalities in this state that have an effective flood insurance rate map or flood hazard boundary map published by the federal emergency management agency that identifies a special flood hazard area within the political boundaries of the county or municipality shall meet the requirements for participation in the national flood insurance program authorized by 42 U.S.C. § 4001 et seq. and administered by the federal emergency management agency on or before June 30, 2012.

If a county or municipality does not currently have an effective flood insurance rate map or flood hazard boundary map published by the federal emergency management agency that identifies a special flood hazard area within the political boundaries of county or municipality, the county or municipality shall have twenty-four (24) months from the effective date of any future flood insurance rate map or flood hazard boundary map published by the federal emergency management agency to meet the requirements for participation in the national flood insurance program.

Acts 2010, ch. 1091, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning state government efforts to provide secure and efficient processing of information through call centers, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 1091.

6-58-118. Urban growth boundaries — Expansion without reconvening coordinating committee or approval from county.

A municipality may expand its urban growth boundaries to annex a tract of land without reconvening the coordinating committee or approval from the county or any other municipality if:

The tract is contiguous to a tract of land that has the same owner and has already been annexed by the municipality;

The tract is being provided water and sewer services; and

The owner of the tract, by notarized petition, consents to being included within the urban growth boundaries of the municipality.

Acts 2014, ch. 707, § 6.